Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2701.01
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of sections 2-2701 to 2-2711, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Board means the University of Nebraska
Board of Tractor Test Engineers which shall consist of three engineers under
the control of the university;

(2) Current tractor model means any
model included in the manufacturer's annual price list of tractors being offered
for sale by its dealers or distributors;

(3) Department means the
Department of Agriculture;

(4) Director means the Director of Agriculture
or his or her authorized representative;

(5) Person means bodies politic and corporate,
societies, communities, the public generally, individuals, partnerships, limited
liability companies, joint-stock companies, and associations; and

(6) Tractor means a traction machine designed
and advertised primarily to supply power to agricultural implements and farmstead
equipment. An agricultural tractor propels itself and provides a force in
the direction of travel and
may provide mechanical, hydraulic, and electrical power and control to
enable attached soil-engaging and other agricultural implements to perform
their intended function.

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 381, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 67;

Laws 2012, LB907, § 2.